Indiana, session 2026, SB237.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 13-11-2-49.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 49.5. "Decision", for purposes of
IC 13-14-2-10, includes standards, permits, enforcement actions,
and clean up levels.
SECTION 2. IC 13-11-2-163.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 163.3. "PFAS chemicals", for
purposes of IC 13-14-2-11, means non-polymeric perfluoroalkyl
substances or non-polymeric saturated polyfluoroalkyl substances
that are a group of manmade chemicals that:
(1) are likely to be persistent in the environment; and
(2) have bioaccumulation potential in humans, animals, or the
environment.
SECTION 3. IC 13-11-2-221.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 221.3. (a) "State prioritized PFAS
2026 IN 237—LS 6713/DI 153


chemicals", for purposes of IC 13-14-2-11, means non-polymeric
perfluoroalkyl substances or non-polymeric saturated
polyfluoroalkyl substances that are a group of manmade chemicals
that:
(1) contain at least two (2) fully fluorinated sequential carbon
atoms;
(2) are likely to be persistent in the environment;
(3) have bioaccumulation potential in humans, animals, or the
environment; and
(4) are regulated by the United States Environmental
Protection Agency under the federal Safe Drinking Water Act
(42 U.S.C. 300f et seq.) with respect to maximum contaminant
levels.
(b) The term includes the following targeted fluorinated
substances:
(1) Perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA) and its salts.
(2) Perfluorooctanesulfonic acid or perfluorooctane sulfonate
(PFOS) and its salts.
(c) The term does not include gases or substances that become
gases in use.
SECTION 4. IC 13-14-2-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The department may not base a decision
primarily on federal risk values that have not been promulgated
through federal rulemaking, including:
(1) reference doses;
(2) reference concentrations;
(3) inhalation unit risks; or
(4) hazard determinations, assessments, evaluations, goals, or
toxicity or risk values;
developed or issued under the United States Environmental
Protection Agency's Integrated Risk Information System, 42 U.S.C.
300g-1, or 15 U.S.C. 2605.
(b) The department shall avoid the use of federal risk values
that are at or below background concentrations in air, water, soil,
or sediment.
SECTION 5. IC 13-14-2-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 11. The department shall focus on state prioritized
PFAS chemicals when PFAS chemicals are relevant to carrying out
the department's duties under this title, including research,
outreach, testing, and risk communication.
2026 IN 237—LS 6713/DI 153